Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) All private entities that receive, either as a grantee or a subgrantee, a grant that is funded in whole or in part by state funds must disclose on its website or other publicly accessible means the following information within five business days of being awarded the grant:(a) The name of each employee of the private entity and wages paid to each employee;(b) The name of each board member of the private entity and any compensation paid to each board member;(c) Any political contributions made by the private entity in the previous four election cycles;(d) The name of any lobbyist who is either employed with the private entity or who the private entity has contracted with for lobbying services; and(e) An accounting of how the grant money was spent by the private entity.(2) Any agency that awards, either directly or as pass-through funding, a grant that is funded in whole or in part by state funds shall ensure that grantees and subgrantees are in compliance with subsection (1) of this section. Noncompliance with subsection (1) of this section must result in a forfeit of the award and the noncompliant private entity shall reimburse the grantor the complete amount of the funds awarded.(3) The following definitions apply to this section:(a)(i) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.(ii) "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.(iii) "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.(b) "Grant" does not include a business transaction for the procurement of goods and services, as those terms are defined in RCW 39.26.010.(c) "Private entity" means any nonpublic individual firm, corporation, association, partnership, consortium, joint venture, nonprofit organization, and any other nonpublic entity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.--- END ---